Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.49 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act, “eligible new corporation” means any


corporation that has been in operation for fewer than five (5)


years, and is validly licensed as provided in the applicable laws of


this state on and after the effective date of this act.


B. For competitive bids submitted to the state pursuant to the


Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act or pursuant to the Public


Competitive Bidding Act of 1974 by eligible new corporations, the


State Purchasing Director shall prepare and implement a bid-


preference program. The program shall require that, if the


percentage of such funds expended on eligible new corporations is

Req. No. 3038 Page 1


less than ten percent (10%), a percentage shall be added to the


price of the lowest bid and if the eligible new corporation submits


a bid that falls below the lowest bid plus the percentage, it shall


receive the contract.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3038 BRC 12/31/2025 10:37:30 AM



































Req. No. 3038 Page 2